Utah statutes.
53A-1-412.   State Board of Education to determine how to reduce reporting requirements.

(1)  The State Board of Education, in consultation with representatives of school districts and charter schools, shall determine how reporting requirements may be modified or eliminated to reduce the time school district and charter school personnel spend in completing reports.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall:

(a)  seek to eliminate redundancy in reporting information; and

(b)  consider eliminating a report that has low value compared to the time and effort spent to produce the report.

(3)  The State Board of Education shall make a report to the Education Interim Committee by the committee's October 2012 meeting on:

(a)  actions taken by the State Board of Education to modify or eliminate reporting requirements; and

(b)  recommendations for the elimination or modification of reporting requirements imposed by state statute.

